Maryland, session 2025, HB0860.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 26. PUBLIC NUISANCE CAUSED BY COMMON CARRIERS.
3–2601.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “COMMON CARRIER” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS ENGAGED IN THE
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION OF PERSONS FOR HIRE BY LAND.
(2) “COMMON CARRIER” INCLUDES:
(I) A CAR COMPANY, A MOTOR VEHICLE COMPANY, AN
AUTOMOBILE COMPANY, OR A MOTOR BUS COMPANY;
(II) A RAILROAD COMPANY, STREET RAILROAD COMPANY, OR
SLEEPING CAR COMPANY; AND
(III) A TAXICAB COMPANY;
– 1 –

Ch. 454 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) A TRANSIT COMPANY; AND
(V) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY.
(3) “COMMON CARRIER” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY ENTITY OWNED BY
THE STATE OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(C) “PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE” MEANS A BRIDGE OR HIGHWAY OWNED,
CONTROLLED, OR MAINTAINED BY THE STATE OR A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
GOVERNMENT.
3–2602.
(A) (1) A COMMON CARRIER OR AN EMPLOYEE OF THE COMMON CARRIER
MAY NOT CAUSE DAMAGE TO PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE THAT NECESSITATES THE
CLOSURE OF THE PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE.
(2) A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS A
PUBLIC NUISANCE.
(B) AN ACTION AGAINST A COMMON CARRIER FOR A PUBLIC NUISANCE
CAUSED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BE BROUGHT BY THE FOLLOWING:
(1) FOR PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE OWNED, CONTROLLED, OR
MAINTAINED BY THE STATE, THE STATE; OR
(2) FOR PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE OWNED, CONTROLLED, OR
MAINTAINED BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, COUNSEL DESIGNATED OR RETAINED BY A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT OF THE JURISDICTION WHERE THE INFRASTRUCTURE IS
LOCATED.
(C) (1) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE STATE OR A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY SEEK:
(I) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(II) DECLARATORY RELIEF; AND
(III) COMPENSATORY DAMAGES FOR THE COST OF THE REPAIR
OR REPLACEMENT OF THE AFFECTED INFRASTRUCTURE.
(2) IN ADDITION TO ANY RELIEF GRANTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, A COMMON CARRIER THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IS MAY BE LIABLE TO THE STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT FOR CIVIL
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 454
PENALTIES OF $1,000 PER DAY FOR EACH DAY THE PUBLIC NUISANCE CONTINUES
UNTIL THE PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE IS SUFFICIENTLY REPAIRED FOR PUBLIC USE
OR IS REPLACED.
(D) THE STATE OR A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY FILE AN ACTION AGAINST A
COMMON CARRIER UNDER THIS SECTION AT ANY TIME FOLLOWING THE VIOLATION
GIVING RISE TO THE CAUSE OF ACTION AND UNTIL THE PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE
IS SUFFICIENTLY REPAIRED FOR PUBLIC USE OR IS REPLACED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –